Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-2104
Notice of lien; mailing of notice
required; effect on lien.

The commercial real estate broker shall, within ten days
after recording its notice of lien, either mail a copy of the notice of lien
to the owner of record of the commercial real estate by registered or certified
mail at the address of the owner stated in the commission agreement on which
the claim for lien is based or, if no such address is given, then to the address
of the commercial real estate on which the claim of lien is based. Mailing
of the copy of the notice of lien is effective when deposited in a United
States mailbox with postage prepaid. The commercial real estate broker's lien
shall be unenforceable if mailing or service of the copy of notice of lien
does not occur at the time and in the manner required by this section.

Laws 2013, LB3, § 10.